California, session 20252026, SB900.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 84502 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 9 of Chapter 887 of the Statutes of 2022, is amended to read:84502. (a) (1) Any advertisement not described in subdivision (b) of Section 84504.3 that is paid for by a committee pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 82013, other than a political party committee or a candidate controlled committee established for an elective office of the controlling candidate, shall include the words “Ad paid for by” followed by the name of the committee as it appears on the most recent statement of organization filed pursuant to Section 84101.(2) Any advertisement not described in subdivision (b) of Section 84504.3 that is paid for by a committee pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 82013 that is a political party committee or a candidate controlled committee established for an elective office of the controlling candidate shall include the words “Ad paid for by” followed by the name of the committee as it appears on the most recent statement of organization filed pursuant to Section 84101 if the advertisement is any of the following:(A) Paid for by an independent expenditure.(B) An advertisement supporting or opposing a ballot measure.(C) A radio or television advertisement.(D) A text message advertisement that is required to include a disclosure pursuant to Section 84504.7.(b) Any advertisement not described in subdivision (b) of Section 84504.3 that is paid for by a committee pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 82013 shall include the words “Ad paid for by” followed by the name that the filer is required to use on campaign statements pursuant to subdivision (o) of Section 84211.(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), if an advertisement is a printed letter, internet website, or email message, the text described in subdivisions (a) and (b) may include the words “Paid for by” instead of “Ad paid for by.”(d) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), if an advertisement is a text message, the text described in subdivisions (a) and (b) may include the words “Paid for by” or “With,” instead of “Ad paid for by.”(e) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the following types of advertisements may display the shortened name of a committee pursuant to either paragraph (2) or (3), as applicable:(A) A video advertisement that is disseminated over the internet. (B) A print advertisement that is larger than those designed to be individually distributed subject to subdivision (b) of Section 84504.2, including, but not limited to, a yard sign or billboard.(C) An electronic media advertisement that is a graphic, image, animated graphic, or animated image that the online platform hosting the advertisement allows to link to an internet website paid for by a committee subject to subdivision (b) of Section 84504.3.(D) A text message advertisement subject to Section 84504.7. (2) Displaying only enough of the first part of the committee name to uniquely identify the committee. If the committee is a sponsored committee, then the name displayed must include the portion of the committee name that identifies the sponsor or sponsors, unless all of the sponsors are disclosed on the ad as top contributors as required by Section 84503. For example, if ACME Corporation is not listed as a top contributor, then a committee named “Yes on 99, Californians for a Better Tomorrow, a coalition of X, Y, and Z. Sponsored by ACME Corporation” may be disclosed as only “Yes on 99, Californians for a Better Tomorrow. Sponsored by ACME Corporation.”(3) If the advertisement is paid for by a committee that has top contributors and is subject to Section 84503, then the committee name may be replaced by displaying the words “Committee ID” followed by the committee’s identification number.SEC. 2. Section 84502 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 49 of Chapter 278 of the Statutes of 2025, is amended to read:84502. (a) (1) Any advertisement not described in subdivision (b) of Section 84504.3 that is paid for by a committee pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 82013, other than a political party committee or a candidate controlled committee established for an elective office of the controlling candidate, shall include the words “Ad paid for by” followed by the name of the committee as it appears on the most recent committee registration filed pursuant to Section 84101.(2) Any advertisement not described in subdivision (b) of Section 84504.3 that is paid for by a committee pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 82013 that is a political party committee or a candidate controlled committee established for an elective office of the controlling candidate shall include the words “Ad paid for by” followed by the name of the committee as it appears on the most recent committee registration filed pursuant to Section 84101 if the advertisement is any of the following:(A) Paid for by an independent expenditure.(B) An advertisement supporting or opposing a ballot measure.(C) A radio or television advertisement.(D) A text message advertisement that is required to include a disclosure pursuant to Section 84504.7.(b) Any advertisement not described in subdivision (b) of Section 84504.3 that is paid for by a committee pursuant to subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 82013 shall include the words “Ad paid for by” followed by the name that the filer is required to use on campaign reports pursuant to subdivision (o) of Section 84211.(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), if an advertisement is a printed letter, internet website, or email message, the text described in subdivisions (a) and (b) may include the words “Paid for by” instead of “Ad paid for by.”(d) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), if an advertisement is a text message, the text described in subdivisions (a) and (b) may include the words “Paid for by” or “With,” instead of “Ad paid for by.”(e) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the following types of advertisements may display the shortened name of a committee pursuant to either paragraph (2) or (3), as applicable:(A) A video advertisement that is disseminated over the internet. (B) A print advertisement that is larger than those designed to be individually distributed subject to subdivision (b) of Section 84504.2, including, but not limited to, a yard sign or billboard.(C) An electronic media advertisement that is a graphic, image, animated graphic, or animated image that the online platform hosting the advertisement allows to link to an internet website paid for by a committee subject to subdivision (b) of Section 84504.3.(D) A text message advertisement subject to Section 84504.7. (2) Displaying only enough of the first part of the committee name to uniquely identify the committee. If the committee is a sponsored committee, then the name displayed must include the portion of the committee name that identifies the sponsor or sponsors, unless all of the sponsors are disclosed on the ad as top contributors as required by Section 84503. For example, if ACME Corporation is not listed as a top contributor, then a committee named “Yes on 99, Californians for a Better Tomorrow, a coalition of X, Y, and Z. Sponsored by ACME Corporation” may be disclosed as only “Yes on 99, Californians for a Better Tomorrow. Sponsored by ACME Corporation.”(3) If the advertisement is paid for by a committee that has top contributors and is subject to Section 84503, then the committee name may be replaced by displaying the words “Committee ID” followed by the committee’s identification number.SEC. 3. Section 84503 of the Government Code is amended to read:84503. (a) (1) Any advertisement not described in subdivision (b) of Section 84504.3 that is paid for by a committee pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 82013, other than a political party committee or a candidate controlled committee established for an elective office of the controlling candidate, shall include the words “Ad Committee’s Top Funders” unless only one contributor qualifies as a top contributor, in which case the advertisement shall include the words “Ad Committee’s Top Funder.” These words shall be followed by the names of the top contributors to the committee paying for the advertisement.(2) (A) For advertisements other than mass mailings, only the The top three contributors shall be disclosed pursuant to this section. If fewer than three contributors qualify as top contributors, only those contributors that qualify shall be disclosed.(B)If the advertisement is a mass mailing, the top five contributors shall be disclosed pursuant to this section. If fewer than five contributors qualify as top contributors, only those contributors that qualify shall be disclosed.(C)(B) If there are no contributors that qualify as top contributors, this disclosure is not required.(b) The disclosure of a top contributor pursuant to this section shall not include terms such as “incorporated,” “committee,” “political action committee,” “corporation,” “limited liability corporation,” or abbreviations of these terms, unless the term is part of the contributor’s name in common usage or parlance, or as specified in subdivision (d).(c) If this article requires the disclosure of the name of a top contributor that is a committee pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 82013 and is a sponsored committee pursuant to Section 82048.7 with a single sponsor, only the name of the single sponsoring organization shall be disclosed.(d) If this article requires the disclosure of the name of a top contributor that is a committee created pursuant to Section 84222, only the name of the multipurpose organization required to register as that committee shall be disclosed.(e) (1) The disclosure of the name of a top contributor pursuant to this section may be shortened by doing any of the following:(A) Using approved abbreviations as described in paragraph (2).(B) Leaving out “A,” “An,” or “The” at the beginning of an entity name.(C) Leaving out the following words or phrases at the end of the top contributor’s name:(i) The words “and affiliated entities,” “and its subsidiaries,” “AFL-CIO,” “California,” “council,” “group,” “leadership fund,” “of America,” “of California,” “regional council,” “state council,” and “USA.”(ii) Any other words or phrases that the Commission determines are not essential to a voter being able to recognize the top contributors and that are published or provided in written advice by the Commission.(D) Replacing the name of a candidate controlled committee with the name of the candidate, including their office if they are currently an officeholder, followed by the word “Committee.”(E) Replacing the name of a Yes/No ballot measure committee on Proposition or Measure X with “Yes/No on X: Committee #” followed by the committee’s identification number.(2) Approved abbreviations are any of the following:(A) The two-letter postal abbreviations for states, such as “CA” for “California.”(B) All of the following: “&” for “and,” “Air” for “Airlines,” “Assoc.” for “Association,” “Co.” for “Company,” “Co-op” for “Cooperative,” “Fed.” for “Federation,” “Invest.” for “Investments,” “LA” for “Los Angeles,” “Prop.” for “Proposition,” “NorCal” for “Northern California,” “SoCal” for “Southern California,” “Tech.” for “Technology” or “Technologies,” “Yes/No on” for “Yes/No on Measure,” “Yes/No on” for “Yes/No on Proposition,” and “Yes/No on” for “Yes/No on Prop.”(C) Any other abbreviations that the Commission determines meet all of the following criteria:(i) The abbreviation is likely to be widely recognizable by voters.(ii) The abbreviation is unambiguous in its intended meaning within entity names.(iii) The abbreviation is published or provided in written advice by the Commission. (f) This section does not apply to a committee as defined by subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 82013.(g) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), if an advertisement is a printed letter, internet website, email message, or text message, the text described in subdivision (a) may include the words “Committee Top Funders” or “Committee Top Funder” instead of “Ad Committee’s Top Funders” or “Ad Committee’s Top Funder.”SEC. 4. Section 84504.2 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 3 of Chapter 260 of the Statutes of 2024, is amended to read:84504.2. (a) A print advertisement paid for by a committee, other than a political party committee or a candidate controlled committee established for an elective office of the controlling candidate, shall include the disclosures required by Sections 84514, 84506.5, 84502, and 84503, as applicable, displayed in that order, and further displayed as follows:(1) The disclosure area shall have a solid white background and shall be in a printed or drawn box on the bottom of at least one page that is set apart from any other printed matter. All text in the disclosure area shall be in contrasting color and centered horizontally in the disclosure area.(2) The text shall be in standard Arial Regular type with a type size of at least 10-point for printed advertisements designed to be individually distributed, including, but not limited to, mailers, flyers, and door hangers.(3) The disclosure required by Section 84514, if any, shall appear at the top of the disclosure area, and shall be separated from any disclosures that follow by at least half a blank line.(4) An advertisement subject to Section 84506.5 shall include the disclosure required by Section 84506.5 after the disclosure required by Section 84514 and shall be separated from any disclosures that follow by at least half a blank line.(5) The disclosure required by Section 84502 shall follow the disclosures required by Sections 84514 and 84506.5, if any. (6) If there are any top contributors, the disclosure required by Section 84503 shall follow the disclosure required by Section 84502. The phrase “Ad Committee’s Top Funders” or “Ad Committee’s Top Funder” shall be underlined and displayed on a horizontal line separate from any other text.(7) The top contributors, if any, shall each be disclosed on a horizontal line separate from any other text, in descending order, beginning with the top contributor who made the largest cumulative contributions on the first line. The name of each of the top contributors shall be centered horizontally in the disclosure area, shall be printed in bold type, and shall not be underlined. The names of the top contributors shall not be printed in a type that is condensed to be narrower than a normal non-condensed standard Arial Regular type. (8) A committee subject to Section 84223 shall next include the text “Funding Details At [insert Commission Internet Website],” which shall be underlined and printed on a line separate from any other text.(b) Notwithstanding paragraphs (2), (6), and (7) of subdivision (a), the disclosures required by Sections 84514, 84506.5, 84502, and 84503 on a printed advertisement that is larger than those designed to be individually distributed, including, but not limited to, yard signs or billboards, shall be displayed in that order, in standard Arial Regular type with a total height of at least 5 percent of the height or width of the advertisement, whichever is less. The text may be adjusted so it does not appear on separate horizontal lines, except that the top contributors shall all appear together on one horizontal line, if possible, with the top contributors separated by a clearly visible bullet point or by putting the number “1.” in front of the larger contributor, “2.” in front of the second largest contributor, and “3.” in front of the third largest contributor, as applicable.(c) Notwithstanding the definition of “top contributors” in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 84501, newspaper, magazine, or other public print advertisements that are 20 square inches or less shall be required to disclose only the single top contributor of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or more.(d) Any text or image not required in this section shall not appear in the disclosure area, except as provided in Section 84504.8 and as otherwise authorized or provided by applicable law.SEC. 5. Section 84504.2 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 4 of Chapter 260 of the Statutes of 2024, is amended to read:84504.2. (a) A print advertisement designed to be individually distributed, including, but not limited to, a mailer, flyer, or door hanger, that is paid for by a committee, other than a political party committee or a candidate controlled committee established for an elective office of the controlling candidate, shall include the disclosures required by Sections 84514, 84506.5, 84502, and 84503, as applicable, displayed in that order, and further displayed as follows:(1) The disclosure area shall have a solid white background and shall be in a printed or drawn box on the bottom of at least one page that is set apart from any other printed matter. All text in the disclosure area shall be in contrasting color and centered horizontally in the disclosure area.(2) The text shall be in standard Arial Regular type with a type size of at least 10-point.(3) The disclosure required by Section 84514, if any, shall appear at the top of the disclosure area, and shall be separated from any disclosures that follow by at least half a blank line.(4) An advertisement subject to Section 84506.5 shall include the disclosure required by Section 84506.5 after the disclosure required by Section 84514 and shall be separated from any disclosures that follow by at least half a blank line.(5) The disclosure required by Section 84502 shall follow the disclosures required by Sections 84514 and 84506.5, if any. (6) If there are any top contributors, the disclosure required by Section 84503 shall follow the disclosure required by Section 84502. The phrase “Ad Committee’s Top Funders” or “Ad Committee’s Top Funder” shall be underlined and displayed on a horizontal line separate from any other text.(7) The top contributors, if any, shall each be disclosed on a horizontal line separate from any other text, in descending order, beginning with the top contributor who made the largest cumulative contributions on the first line. The name of each of the top contributors shall be centered horizontally in the disclosure area, shall be printed in bold type, and shall not be underlined. The names of the top contributors shall not be printed in a type that is condensed to be narrower than a normal non-condensed standard Arial Regular type.(8) A committee subject to Section 84223 shall next include the text “Funding Details At [insert link to Secretary of State internet website page with top 10 contributor lists],” which shall be underlined and printed on a line separate from any other text at the bottom of the disclosure area.(9) Notwithstanding the definition of “top contributors” in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 84501, newspaper, magazine, or other public print advertisements that are 20 square inches or less shall be required to disclose only the largest top contributor of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or more.(b) A print advertisement that is larger than those designed to be individually distributed, including, but not limited to, a yard sign or billboard, paid for by a committee, other than a political party committee or a candidate controlled committee established for an elective office of the controlling candidate, shall include the disclosures required by Sections 84514, 84506.5, 84502, and 84503 displayed in that order in a printed or drawn box with a solid white background on the bottom of the advertisement that is set apart from any other printed matter. Each line of the written disclosures shall be in a contrasting color in standard Arial Regular type no less than 5 percent of the height or width of the advertisement, whichever is less, and shall not be condensed to be narrower than a normal non-condensed standard Arial Regular type. The text may be adjusted so it does not appear on separate horizontal lines, except that the top contributors shall all appear together on one horizontal line, if possible, with the top contributors separated by a clearly visible bullet point or by putting the number “1.” in front of the larger contributor, “2.” in front of the second largest contributor, and “3.” in front of the third largest contributor, as applicable.(c) Any text or image not required in this section shall not appear in the disclosure area, except as provided in Section 84504.8 and as otherwise authorized or provided by applicable law.SEC. 6. Section 84506.5 of the Government Code is amended to read:84506.5. An advertisement supporting or opposing a candidate that is paid for by an independent expenditure shall include the statement, “Not paid for by candidate.” If the advertisement was authorized or paid for by a candidate for another office, the expenditure shall instead include the statement, “Not paid for by a candidate for this office.”SEC. 7. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SEC. 8. The Legislature finds and declares that this bill furthers the purposes of the Political Reform Act of 1974 within the meaning of subdivision (a) of Section 81012 of the Government Code.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________